Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1168.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-1213, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1213. Business entities; registration; renewal; civil penalty; exceptions A. A business entity may not offer dental services pursuant to this chapter unless: 1. The business entity is registered with the board pursuant to this section. 2. The services are conducted by a licensee pursuant to this chapter. B. The business entity must file a registration application on a form provided by the board.  The application must include: 1. A description of the business entity's services offered to the public. 2. The name of any dentist who is authorized to provide and who is responsible for providing the dental services offered at each office. 3. The names and addresses of the officers and directors of the business entity. 4. The name of the business entity's custodian of records. 5. A registration fee prescribed by the board in rule. C. A business entity must file a separate registration application and pay a fee for each branch office in this state. D. A registration expires three years after the date the board issues the registration. A business entity that wishes to renew a registration must submit an application for renewal as prescribed by the board on a triennial basis on a form provided by the board before the expiration date. A business entity that fails to renew the registration before the expiration date is subject to a late fee as prescribed by the board by rule.  The board may stagger the dates for renewal applications. E. The business entity must notify the board in writing within thirty days after any change: 1. In the business entity's name, address or telephone number. 2. In the officers or directors of the business entity. 3. In the name of any dentist who is authorized to provide and who is responsible for providing the dental services in any facility. 4. In the name of the business entity's custodian of records who will accept subpoenas and respond to patient records requests. F. The business entity shall establish a written protocol for the secure storage, transfer and access of the dental records of the business entity's patients. This protocol must include, at a minimum, procedures for: 1. Notifying patients of the future locations of their records if the business entity terminates or sells the practice. 2. Disposing of unclaimed dental records. 3. The timely response to requests by patients for copies of their records. G. The business entity must notify the board within thirty days after the dissolution of any registered business entity or the closing or relocation of any facility and must disclose to the board the business entity's procedure by which its patients may obtain their records. H. The board may do any of the following pursuant to its disciplinary procedures if a business entity violates the board's statutes or rules: 1. Refuse to issue a registration. 2. Suspend or revoke a registration. 3. Impose a civil penalty of not more than $2,000 for each violation. 4. Enter a decree of censure. 5. Issue an order prescribing a period and terms of probation that are best adapted to protect the public welfare and that may include a requirement for restitution to a patient for a violation of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. 6. Issue a letter of concern if a business entity's actions may cause the board to take disciplinary action. I. The board shall deposit, pursuant to sections 35-146 and 35-147, civil penalties collected pursuant to this section in the state general fund. J. This section does not apply to: 1. A sole proprietorship or partnership that consists exclusively of dentists who are licensed pursuant to this chapter. 2. Any of the following entities licensed under title 20: (a) A service corporation. (b) An insurer authorized to transact disability insurance. (c) A prepaid dental plan organization that does not provide directly for prepaid dental services. (d) A health care services organization that does not provide directly for dental services. 3. A professional corporation or professional limited liability company, the shares of which are exclusively owned by dentists who are licensed pursuant to this chapter and that is formed to engage in the practice of dentistry pursuant to title 10, chapter 20 or title 29 relating to professional limited liability companies. 4. A facility regulated by the federal government or a state, district or territory of the United States. 5. An administrator or executor of the estate of a deceased dentist or a person who is legally authorized to act for a dentist who has been adjudicated to be mentally incompetent for not more than one year after the date the board receives notice of the dentist's death or incapacitation pursuant to section 32-1270. 6. A recognized dental school, recognized dental therapy school or recognized dental hygiene school. K. A facility that offers dental services to the public by persons licensed under this chapter shall be registered by the board unless the facility is any of the following: 1. Owned by a dentist who is licensed pursuant to this chapter. 2. Regulated by the federal government or a state, district or territory of the United States. 3. A recognized dental school, recognized dental therapy school or recognized dental hygiene school. L. Except for issues relating to insurance coding and billing that require the name, signature and license number of the dentist providing treatment, this section does not: 1. Authorize a licensee in the course of providing dental services for a business entity registered pursuant to this section to disregard or interfere with a policy or practice established by the business entity for the operation and management of the business. 2. Authorize a business entity registered pursuant to this section to establish or enforce a business policy or practice that may interfere with the clinical judgment of the licensee in providing dental services for the business entity or may compromise a licensee's ability to comply with this chapter. M. The board shall adopt rules that provide a method for the board to receive the assistance and advice of business entities licensed pursuant to this chapter in all matters relating to the regulation of business entities. N. An individual currently holding a surrendered or revoked license to practice dentistry or dental hygiene in any state or jurisdiction in the United States may not have a majority ownership interest in the business entity registered pursuant to this section. Revocation and surrender of licensure shall be limited to disciplinary actions resulting in loss of license or surrender of license instead of disciplinary action. Dentists or dental hygienists affected by this subsection shall have one year after the surrender or revocation to divest themselves of their ownership interest. This subsection does not apply to publicly held companies. For the purposes of this subsection, "majority ownership interest" means an ownership interest greater than fifty percent. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 32-1231, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1231. Persons not required to be licensed; school employee lists; complaints; board jurisdiction A. This chapter does not prohibit: 1. A dentist, dental therapist or dental hygienist who is officially employed in the service of the United States from practicing dentistry in the dentist's, dental therapist's or dental hygienist's official capacity, within the scope of that person's authority, on persons who are enlisted in, directly connected with or under the immediate control of some branch of service of the United States. 2. A person, whether or not licensed by this state, from practicing dental therapy either: (a) In the discharge of official duties on behalf of the United States government, including the United States department of veterans affairs, the United States public health service and the Indian health service. (b) While employed by tribal health programs authorized pursuant to Public Law 93-638 or urban Indian health programs. 3. An intern or student of dentistry, dental therapy or dental hygiene from operating practicing in the clinical departments or laboratories of a recognized dental school, recognized dental therapy school, recognized dental hygiene school or hospital under the supervision of a dentist. 4. An unlicensed person from performing for a licensed dentist merely mechanical work on inert matter not within the oral cavity in the construction, making, alteration or repairing of any artificial dental substitute or any dental restorative or corrective appliance, if the casts or impressions for that work have been furnished by a licensed dentist and the work is directly supervised by the dentist for whom done or under a written authorization signed by the dentist, but the burden of proving that written authorization or direct supervision is on the person charged with having violated this provision. 5. A clinician who is not licensed in this state from giving demonstrations, before bona fide dental societies, study clubs and groups of professional students, that are free to the persons on whom made. 6. The state director of dental public health from performing the director's administrative duties as prescribed by law. 7. A dentist or dental hygienist to whom a restricted permit has been issued from practicing dentistry or dental hygiene in this state as provided in sections 32-1237 and 32-1292. 8. A dentist, dental therapist or dental hygienist from practicing for educational purposes on behalf in the clinical departments or laboratories of a recognized dental school, recognized dental therapy school or recognized dental hygiene school. 9. A dentist who holds an active and unrestricted license in another state, territory or possession of the United States from practicing for educational purposes in connection with recognized continuing dental education. A dentist who practices under this paragraph: (a) May not receive compensation for dental services provided in connection with recognized continuing dental education. (b) Is subject to the jurisdiction and discipline of the board to the same extent as dentists who are licensed in this state. (c) May not provide any dental care or services in this state to a person who is either: (i) Physically unable to safely receive the dental care or services. (ii) Not mentally competent to knowingly and voluntarily consent to the dental care or services. (d) Shall file a restricted permit application on a form approved by the board with the provider of the recognized continuing dental education before providing any dental care or services in this state. The provider of the recognized continuing dental education shall retain the dentist's restricted permit application for a period of at least five years. B. A recognized dental school shall annually provide to the board a list of the licensed dentists, dental therapists and dental hygienists that the recognized dental school employs to practice in the recognized dental school's clinical departments or laboratories. C. If the board receives a complaint that names a recognized dental school or that arises from dental care that is provided at a recognized dental school, the board shall forward the complaint to the recognized dental school on a periodic basis as determined by the board but not more than six months after the board receives the complaint.  The recognized dental school shall review the complaint pursuant to the recognized dental school's internal quality assurance process. D. The board does not have jurisdiction or authority over any person, whether or not licensed by this state, who is acting within the scope of subsection A, paragraph 3 or 8 of this section, except that a licensee is subject to board jurisdiction for a conviction as described in section 32-1263, subsection A, paragraph 2 and is required to comply with section 32-3208. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 32-1237, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-1237. Restricted permits A. A person may apply for a restricted permit if the applicant demonstrates to the board's satisfaction that the applicant: 1. Has a pending contract with a recognized charitable dental clinic or organization or will be practicing for educational purposes in connection with and while enrolled in recognized continuing dental education that offers dental services without compensation or at a rate that only reimburses the clinic for dental supplies and overhead costs and the applicant will receive no compensation for dental services provided at the clinic or organization or in connection with the recognized continuing dental education. 2. Has a license to practice dentistry issued by another state or territory of the United States or the District of Columbia. 3. Has been actively engaged in one or more of the following for at least three years immediately preceding the application: (a) The practice of dentistry. (b) An approved dental residency training program. (c) Postgraduate training deemed by the board equivalent to an approved dental residency training program. 4. Is competent and proficient to practice dentistry. 5. Meets the requirements of section 32-1232, subsection A, other than the requirement to meet section 32-1233. B. For the purposes of meeting the requirements of subsection A of this section, the provider of the recognized continuing dental education, before the commencement of the recognized continuing dental education, shall notify the board of the restricted permit applicants the provider has accepted that who meet the requirements of section 32-1231, subsection a, paragraph 9.  The board shall acknowledge receipt of the notification within five business days after the later of receiving either: 1. The notification. 2. A copy of the applicants' valid fingerprint clearance cards. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 4, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 5, 2026.